src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{уюØ%}:у"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{уюØ%}:у <=> [CnsSoft %{SYNCS%}:|%{SYNCH%}: | %{NOSYNCH%}: | %{VCH%}: | %{VCCH%}: | [CnsSoft | CnsAlv| CnsNonAlv | р] %{VU%}: ]  %> _  \[%^RmVow:] ;
    CnsSoft [%{VCS%}:] %> _ \[%^RmVow:] ;
    [ы:0|ы] щ %{SYNCS%}: %> _  Cns ; 
! Cns %> _  ;
!! ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: __sea/meri__
!!€ ща̄рыщ{SYNCS}>{уюØ}м
!!€ ща̄р0щ0>ум
!!$ ща̄рыщ{SYNCS}>{уюØ}м
!!$ ща̄р0щ0>юм
!! а̄щ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: __father/isä__
!!€ а̄щ{VCS}>{уюØ}м
!!€ а̄щ0>ум

"%{уюØ%}:ю"
!! __@RULENAME@__
  %{уюØ%}:ю <=> [CnsAlv %{VCCS%}:|[CnsAlv|й:] %{VCS%}:|CnsAlv %{NOSYNCS%}: | [й:| ь: ] %{VU%}:]  %> _  \[%^RmVow:] ;
                                   %{VI%}:  %> _  в ;
                       CnsAlv ь: %{SYNCS%}: %> _ Cns ; 
  ! [ и | ы | ь: ] %> _  ;
!! коюӈкве+V+Inf: **track/jäljittää, vuottaa**
!!€ кой{VU}>{уюØ}ӈкве
!!€ ко00>юӈкве
!! кӯщай+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:
!!€ кӯщай{VCS}>{уюØ}в
!!€ кӯща00>юв

!! ### Suffix vowel lengthening

"%{аяLong%}:а̄"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{аяLong%}:а̄ <=>  [ Cns (%{SYNCH%}:|%{NOSYNCH%}:|%{VCH%}:|%{VCCH%}:)| г] %> _ ;
!   г %> _ ;
!коскер+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Err/Orth:

"%{аяLong%}:я̄"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{аяLong%}:я̄ <=>   %{ЫИ%}: %> _ ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg+Err/Orth

"%{аяLong%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{аяLong%}:0 <=> [ я: | а: ]  %{VO%}: %> _ ;




"%{ЭЕLong%}:э̄"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЭЕLong%}:э̄ <=>     [CnsAlv %{VA%}:|%{VO%}:]   %> (%{тØ%}:) _ ;
             [CnsAlv - р|Vow] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %>           _ ; ! from "%{ЭЕ%}:э"
!! аки
!!€ аки{VI}>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}н
!!€ аки0>тэ̄н
                   CnsAlv [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:] %> (%{тØ%}:) _ [г | в] ;
 [ CnsAlv ] [%{SYNCH%}:|%{VCH%}:|%{VCCH%}:] %> (%{тØ%}:) _ ;

 "%{ЭЕLong%}:е̄"
 !! __@RULENAME@__
  %{ЭЕLong%}:е̄ <=> [ CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | ь: | й: | р] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:] %> _ ;
 !!€ ха̄ль%>%{тØ%}%{ЭLongЕ%н
 !!€ ха̄л0%>0е̄н
 а̄ %> _ ;
 [ CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | ь: | й: | р] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:] %> _ [г | в ] ;
    CnsNonAlv [ %{VCH%}:|%{VCCH%}:] %> _ ;
  [ CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | ь: | й: | р] %{SYNCH%}: %> (%{тØ%}:) _ ;
   %{SYNCS%}: %> (%{тØ%}:) _ ;
 !!€ хӯрыг{SYNCH}>{ЭЕLong}н
 !!€ хӯр0г0>е̄н


"{ЭЕ}:э"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЭЕ%}:э <=> [CnsAlv - р|Vow] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %>           _ ;
                         Vow  [ %{VO%}: | %{VI%}: ]          %>  %{тØ%}:  _ ;
  [CnsAlv - р] [%{VCH%}:| %{VCCH%}:|%{SYNCH%}:] %> (%{тØ%}:) _ ;
!!€ тот{VU}>{ЭЕ}м
!!€ тот0>эм

"{ЭЕ}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ЭЕ%}:е <=> [ CnsSoft | р | CnsNonAlv | ь: | й:] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %>  _  ;
 [ [р| CnsNonAlv] [%{VCH%}:|%{VCCH%}:|%{SYNCH%}:] |Pal| %{SYNCS%}:] %> (%{тØ%}:) _  ;
                      а̄ %>  _ ;
!!€ ха̄ль%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!!€ ха̄л0%>0е
!!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!!€ пот0р0%>0е

"%{ЫИ%}:ы"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЫИ%}:ы <=> [ CnsAlv - р | Vow ] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ ;
!! тотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu:
!!€ тот{VU}>{ЫИ}ягмен
!!€ тот0>ыягмен
!! tотуӈкве+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg:
!!€ тот{VU}>{ЫИ}лӯв
!!€ тот0>ылӯв
!lang-mns jackrueter$ echo 'т о т {VU}:0 > {ЫИ}:ы л ӯ в'| hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst

"%{ЫИ%}:и"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ЫИ%}:и <=> [ CnsSoft | р | CnsNonAlv | ь: | й: ] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %>  _  ;

!! ### Consonant rules

"й:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 й:0 <=> _ [%{VCS%}:| %{VU%}: | %{VA%}: ] %> [%{ЫИ%}:|%{ыиØ%}:|%{ЭЕ%}:|%{ЭЕLong%}:| ы: |%{уюØ%}:|%{аяØ%}:] ; 
!! коюӈкве+V+Inf: ****
!!€ кой{VU}>{уюØ}ӈкве
!!€ ко00>юӈкве
!! намаяӈкве+V+Ger:
!!€ намай{VA}>{ыиØ}>м
!!€ нама00>и>м

"%{тØ%}:0"
! __@RULENAME@__
 %{тØ%}:0 <=> Cns (ь: ) [%{SYNCH%}:|%{SYNCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{VCH%}:|%{VCCS%}:|%{VCCH%}:] %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: | ы: л ]  ;

! # Cns* (Vow Cns) Vow Cns (ь: ) %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]  ;
!! ха̄ль+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom
!!€ ха̄ль%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!!€ ха̄л0%>0е
!! кол+N+Sg+Ins:
!!€ кол%>%{тØ%}ыл
!!€ кол%>0ыл
!! яныт+N+Sg+Ins:
!!€ яныт>{тØ}ыл
!!€ яныт>0ыл
!! потыр+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom
!!€ потыр>{тØ}{ЭЕ}
!!€ пот0р>0е
! VowNoI %>  _ ы: л ;
!! э̄ква+N+Sg+Ins
!!€ э̄ква>{тØ}ыл
!!€ э̄ква>00л


"%{тØ%}:т"
! __@RULENAME@__
%{тØ%}:т <=> Vow [ %{VO%}: | %{VI%}: ] %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]  ;
            ы  %{VI%}: %> _ %{ыиØ%}: л ;

"н:0 in verbs"
! __@RULENAME@__
н:0 <=>  Vow _ [с| ь: щ] %{VU%}: %> [с|н э | в е|в е̄| м а] ;
!! хансуӈкве+V+PrsPrc: __write/kirjoittaa__
!!€ ханс{VU}>нэ
!!€ ха0с0>нэ
!! пӯнсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: __/__
!!€ пӯнс{VU}>вес
!!€ пӯ0с0>вес

"ӈ:0 in verbs"
! __@RULENAME@__
ӈ:0 <=>  Vow _ [ х ] %{VU%}: %> [с|н э | в е|в е̄| м а] ;
!! таӈхуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: ____
!!€ таӈх{VU}>сум
!!€ та0х0>сум

!€ a
!€ b

!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{УЮØ%}м
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ум
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{тØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>0е
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ЫИØ%}т
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ыт
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>0ме̄н
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>уме̄н

!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>%{тØ%}ыл
!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>00л


!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>%{ЫИØ%}г%>%{ыØ%}н
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>ыг%>0н
!TOS !!€ ха̄п%>%{ыØ%}н
!TOS !!€ ха̄п%>0н

!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>%{ыØ%}н
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>ын
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ыØ%}н
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ын

!TOS !!€ рума%>%{ЫИØ%}%^PxPl2н
!TOS !!€ рума̄%>00н

!TOS !!€ потыр%>%{уюØ%}ме̄н
!TOS !!€ пот0р%>уме̄н
